Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.446

Grain indemnity fund program—Failure to file claim in time.

If a depositor or creditor, after notification, refuses or neglects to file in the office of the director his or her verified claim against a warehouse operator or grain dealer as requested by the director within thirty days from the date of the request, the director shall thereupon be relieved of responsibility for taking action with respect to such claim later asserted and no such claim shall be paid from the grain indemnity fund.

[ 2011 c 336 s 632; 1987 c 509 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.